Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Relocation Assistance

56.610.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky finds and declares the following:

Displacement as a direct result of programs or projects undertaken with federal financial assistance is caused by a number of activities, including rehabilitation, demolition, code enforcement, and acquisition;

Relocation assistance policies shall provide for fair, uniform, and equitable treatment of all affected persons;

The displacement of businesses often results in their closure; and

Minimizing the adverse impact of displacement is essential to maintaining the economic and social well-being of communities.

KRS

56.620

,

56.690

and

56.740

establish a uniform policy for the fair and equitable treatment of persons displaced as a direct result of programs or projects undertaken with federal financial assistance. The primary purpose of the above-mentioned sections shall be to ensure that such persons shall not suffer disproportionate injuries as a result of programs and projects designed for the benefit of the public as a whole and to minimize the hardship of displacement on such persons. The provisions of the above-mentioned sections may be applied to programs and projects undertaken without federal financial assistance.

The following is the intent of the Kentucky General Assembly:

KRS

56.620

,

56.690

and

56.740

shall be carried out in a manner which minimizes waste, fraud and mismanagement and reduces unnecessary administrative costs borne in providing relocation assistance;

Uniform procedures for the administration of relocation assistance shall, to the maximum extent feasible, assure that the unique circumstances of any displaced person are taken into account and that persons in essentially similar circumstances are accorded equal treatment under the above-mentioned sections; and

The improvement of housing conditions of economically disadvantaged persons under the above-mentioned sections shall be undertaken, to the maximum extent feasible, in coordination with existing federal, state and local government programs for accomplishing such goals.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 195, § 1; 1978, ch. 384, § 540, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under this section and KRS

56.630

(now repealed) Kentucky agencies have full statutory authority to comply with the Uniform Relocation Assistance Act.

OAG 72-515

.

The Kentucky relocation assistance legislation narrowly pertains to land acquisitions by a state agency or political subdivision involving “federally assisted projects” which result in displacement of persons due to the operation of such projects and since the city of Hodgenville is being federally assisted with the flood control and watershed programs, such city may properly and legally apply for relocation assistance from the federal government.

OAG 73-609

.

56.620.
Relocation assistance authorized.

If any department, agency or instrumentality of the state, or any county, municipality, or other political subdivision, or any other public or private entity subject to the provisions of the Federal Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, as amended, Public Laws 91-646, and 100-17, Title IV, hereinafter the Federal Uniform Relocation Act, undertakes any project, which results in the acquisition of real property or in any person or persons being displaced from their homes, businesses, or farms, such state department, agency or instrumentality, county, municipality or other political subdivision, or other public or private entity may provide relocation assistance, and make relocation payments to such displaced person and to do such other acts and follow such procedures and practices as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of the Federal Uniform Relocation Act.

Any payment made or to be made under the authority granted herein shall be for compensating or reimbursing the displaced person or owner of real property in accordance with the requirements of the Federal Uniform Relocation Act and such payments shall not for any purpose be deemed or considered compensation for real property acquired or compensation for damages to remaining property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 195, § 2; 1978, ch. 384, § 541, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 206, § 2, effective July 15, 1988.

56.630.
Definitions used in KRS 56.610 to 56.760, 416.140 and 16.470. [Repealed.]

56.640.
Relocation payments — When made. [Repealed.]

56.650.
Payment for displacement from dwelling owned and occupied — Elements of payment. [Repealed.]

56.660.
Payment for displacement from occupied dwelling — Elements of payment. [Repealed.]

56.670.
Relocation assistance advisory program. [Repealed.]

56.680.
Assurance of replacement facilities. [Repealed.]

56.690.
Administrative regulations for relocation assistance.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall adopt such administrative regulations as may be necessary to assure:

That the payments and assistance authorized by KRS

56.620

shall be administered in a manner which is fair and reasonable, and as uniform as practicable;

That a displaced person who makes proper application for a payment authorized for such person by KRS

56.620

shall be paid promptly after a move or, in hardship cases, be paid in advance; and

That any person aggrieved by a determination as to eligibility for a payment authorized by KRS 56.620 or the amount of a payment, may have his application reviewed by the head of the state agency.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may prescribe such other administrative regulations and procedures, consistent with the provisions of KRS

56.620

, as it deems necessary or appropriate to carry out KRS

56.620

.

The Transportation Cabinet shall adopt such administrative regulations and procedures consistent with the provisions of KRS

56.620

, as it deems necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of KRS

56.620

with regard to requirements of the Transportation Cabinet.

Any county, municipality, or other political subdivision, or any other public or private entity subject to the provisions of the Federal Uniform Relocation Act, before undertaking any project involving federal financial assistance which results in the acquisition of real property or in any person or persons being displaced from their homes, businesses, or farms, shall adopt such administrative regulations, ordinances, procedures or policies as necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of KRS

56.620

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 195, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1976, ch. 101, § 2; 1978, ch. 384, § 546, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 15, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 206, § 3, effective July 15, 1988.

56.700.
Contracts for relocation services. [Repealed.]

56.710.
Acquisition funds to be used for relocation. [Repealed.]

56.720.
Relocation computed as cost item to local government in acquisition of real property. [Repealed.]

56.730.
Displaced person defined. [Repealed.]

56.740.
Displacement payments not to be considered income.

No payment received by a displaced person under KRS

56.620

shall be considered as income or resources for the purpose of determining the eligibility or extent of eligibility of any person for assistance under any state law or for the purposes of the state’s personal income tax law, corporation tax law, or other state tax laws. Such payments shall not be considered as income or resources of any recipient of public assistance and such payments shall not be deducted from the amount of aid to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 195, § 14; 1978, ch. 384, § 550, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 206, § 4, effective July 15, 1988.

56.750.
Project funds for relocation assistance — When applied. [Repealed.]

56.760.
Displacement assistance provided jointly with federal government or directly.

When federal funds are available for payment of direct financial assistance to displaced persons, the state agency may match such federal funds to the extent provided by federal law and to provide such direct financial assistance in the instances and on the conditions set forth by federal law and regulations.

When federal funds are not available or used for payment of direct financial assistance to persons displaced by the acquisition of property by the state, the state agency may provide direct financial assistance to such persons. Financial assistance authorized by this subsection shall not exceed the total amount that would have been payable under subsection (1) of this section if federal funds had been available or used. The state agency may adopt rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 195, § 16.